New Jersey, session 221, A1628.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 15 of P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-15) is amended to read as follows: 15.  In addition to any practice declared unlawful pursuant to P.L.1978, c.73 (C.45:1-14 et seq.), it shall be unlawful for a licensed teacher to engage in the following practices: a.     Advertise in a manner which would tend to mislead potential students or consumers of cosmetology and hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, manicuring, hair braiding or skin care specialty services offered in the school clinic; b.    Advertise, teach or attempt to open a school under another person's name; c.     Knowingly permit students to practice upon each other or members of the public while having an infectious, contagious or communicable disease which could reasonably be expected to be transmitted during the course of rendering cosmetology and hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, manicuring, hair braiding or skin care specialty services; d.    Demonstrate cosmetology and hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, manicuring, hair braiding or skin care specialty services on students while knowingly having an infectious, contagious or communicable disease which could reasonably be expected to be transmitted during the course of rendering cosmetology and hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, manicuring, hair braiding or skin care specialty services; e.     Engage in fraudulent practices for the purpose of securing financial aid from any institution or agency offering aid to students of cosmetology and hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, manicuring, hair braiding or skin care specialty; f.     Aid, abet or permit a person not licensed pursuant to this act to teach any of the services included in the definition of cosmetology and hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, manicuring, hair braiding or skin care specialty to registered students; g.    Teach cosmetology and hairstyling, beauty culture, barbering, manicuring, hair braiding or skin care specialty in a manner which is unsatisfactory or unsafe; h.    Fail to display in a conspicuous place a valid teacher's license at the school; [or] i.     Fail to accurately and truthfully record attendance by registered students; or j.     Teach a course in a service not within the scope of practice of the professional license held by the teacher. (cf: P.L.2018, c.126, s.13) 2.    (New section)  An individual licensed by the board in a profession other than cosmetology and hairstyling shall be permitted to teach, in a licensed private school of cosmetology and hairstyling, courses in the profession in which the individual is licensed if the individual: a.     meets the requirements, other than holding a license in cosmetology and hairstyling, established pursuant to section 23 of P.L.1984, c.205 (C.45:5B-23); and b.    provides evidence to the board showing that the training required to obtain the professional license held by the individual is equal to or greater than the training required for the service under the cosmetologist-hairstylist license. 3.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day next following the date of enactment.